Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201673-604
Certain contracts; contractor; provide
information.

Beginning on July 1, 2014, each contract awarded by the
Department of Administrative Services shall require that the contractors provide
to the department any and all information needed for compliance with section
73-603.

Laws 2014, LB371, § 4.